Massachusetts, session 194th, H1268.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Chapter 32A of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the 
following section:- 
Section 33. Any coverage offered by the commission to an active or retired employee of 
the commonwealth insured under the group insurance commission shall provide coverage for a 
prenatal pediatric visit. The term ‘prenatal pediatric visit’ shall mean an appointment between a 
pregnant person and a pediatrician to provide a foundation on which to build a positive, family-
pediatric professional partnership as recommended by the American Academy of Pediatrics. 
SECTION 2. Chapter 118E of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 Official 
Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after section 10Q, the following section:- 
Section 10R. (a) The division and its contracted health insurers, health plans, health 
maintenance organizations, behavioral health management firms and third-party administrators 
under contract to a Medicaid managed care organization or primary care clinician shall provide 

of 3 13 coverage for a prenatal pediatric visit. The term ‘prenatal pediatric visit’ shall mean an 
appointment between a pregnant person and a pediatrician to provide a foundation on which to 
build a positive, family-pediatric professional partnership as recommended by the American 
Academy of Pediatrics. 
(b) The division shall provide notice to its members regarding the coverage required by 
this section. The notice shall be in writing and prominently positioned in any literature or 
correspondence sent to members and shall be transmitted to members within calendar year when 
annual information is made available to members, or in any other mailing or communication to 
members. 
SECTION 3. Chapter 175 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after 
section 47TT the following section:- 
Section 47UU. Any policy, contract, agreement, plan or certificate of insurance issued, 
delivered or renewed within the commonwealth that provides medical expense coverage shall 
provide coverage for a prenatal pediatric visit. The term ‘prenatal pediatric visit’ shall mean an 
appointment between a pregnant person and a pediatrician to provide a foundation on which to 
build a positive, family-pediatric professional partnership as recommended by the American 
Academy of Pediatrics. 
SECTION 4. Chapter 176A of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after 
section 8UU the following section:- 
Section 8VV. A contract between a subscriber and the corporation under an individual or 
group hospital service plan which is delivered, issued or renewed within the commonwealth shall 

of 3 34  provide coverage for a prenatal pediatric visit. The term ‘prenatal pediatric visit’ shall 
mean an appointment between a pregnant person and a pediatrician to provide a foundation on 
which to build a positive, family-pediatric professional partnership as recommended by the 
American Academy of Pediatrics. 
SECTION 5. Chapter 176B of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after 
section 4UU the following section:- 
Section 4VV. Any subscription certificate under an individual or group medical service 
agreement delivered, issued or renewed within the commonwealth shall provide coverage for a 
prenatal pediatric visit. The term ‘prenatal pediatric visit’ shall mean an appointment between a 
pregnant person and a pediatrician to provide a foundation on which to build a positive, family-
pediatric professional partnership as recommended by the American Academy of Pediatrics. 
SECTION 6. Chapter 176G of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after 
section 4MM the following section:- 
Section 4NN. Any individual or group health maintenance contract shall provide 
coverage for a prenatal pediatric visit. The term ‘prenatal pediatric visit’ shall mean an 
appointment between a pregnant person and a pediatrician to provide a foundation on which to 
build a positive, family-pediatric professional partnership as recommended by the American 
Academy of Pediatrics.